Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5813.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-1 of the General Laws entitled "Public Utilities Commission" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-1-64. Cap on energy distribution fees.
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, any public utility
as defined in § 39-1-2 shall not increase the transmission and distribution fees paid by the consumer
on a billing statement for a period of two (2) years commencing July 1, 2025, unless the increase
is approved by affirmative action of the general assembly.
(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a utility having fewer than seven
thousand five hundred (7,500) utility accounts.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002037
========